Louisiana, session 2026, HB371.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:257.1 and 257.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§257.1. Legal representation of elected officials; attorney general; mandatory
representation
A. Duty to represent. The attorney general shall provide legal representation
at no cost to any duly elected official of this state, including members of the
legislature, statewide elected officers, and elected officials of political subdivisions,
when any of the following circumstances apply:
(1) The official is named as a defendant, respondent, or adverse party in any
civil, administrative, or quasi-judicial proceeding arising out of the performance of
the official's duties and exercise of authority in his official capacity.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1019 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 371
(2) The official requires legal guidance or representation before any court,
administrative tribunal, or governmental body in connection with official acts taken
within the scope of his elected office.
(3) The official has been subject to a subpoena, civil investigative demand,
or other compulsory legal process directly related to the exercise of his official
duties.
B. Scope of representation. The duty of representation established in
Subsection A of this Section includes but is not limited to the following:
(1) Filing and arguing dispositive motions including motions to dismiss,
motions for summary judgment, and motions for immunity.
(2) Asserting all applicable defenses including sovereign immunity,
legislative immunity, qualified immunity, and absolute immunity.
(3) Representation through all phases of litigation, appeal, post-judgment
proceedings, and enforcement matters.
(4) Providing legal advice and written opinions on proposed actions to avoid
personal legal liability in the exercise of official duties.
C. Limitations. The duty of representation established in this Section does not
extend to any of the following:
(1) Criminal proceedings arising from acts constituting a crime under state
or federal law, except that the attorney general may, in the attorney general's
discretion, represent such official in administrative proceedings arising from the
same conduct.
(2) Civil proceedings in which the official is alleged to have acted outside
the scope of official duties or for personal gain unrelated to official responsibilities.
(3) Matters where the attorney general determines, in writing, that a clear,
nonwaivable conflict of interest exists between the official and the state.
D. Request for representation. An elected official seeking representation
pursuant to this Section shall submit a written request to the attorney general setting
forth the nature of the proceeding, the official acts at issue, and the relief sought. The
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1019 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 371
attorney general shall respond in writing within fifteen business days of receipt of
such request, either confirming representation or providing written reasons for any
declination.
§257.2. Attorney general; mandatory defense of legislative acts; alternative
representation upon declination
A. Duty to defend acts of the legislature. The attorney general shall defend
the constitutionality and validity of every act duly enacted by the Legislature of
Louisiana in any proceeding in which an act of the legislature is challenged on
constitutional, statutory, or any other grounds, in any court of competent jurisdiction,
whether state or federal.
B. Duty to notify. Upon receipt of any pleading, petition, or motion that
directly challenges the constitutionality or validity of an act of the legislature, the
attorney general shall notify the speaker of the House of Representatives, the
president of the Senate, and the Legislative Bureau within five business days of such
receipt.
C. Declination; written statement required. If the attorney general determines
not to represent an elected official pursuant to R.S. 49:257.1 or declines to defend
an act of the legislature pursuant to Subsection A of this Section, the attorney general
shall do both of the following:
(1)(a) Issue a written statement of declination to the affected official or, in
the case of a legislative act, to the presiding officers of both chambers of the
legislature, within fifteen business days of the request for representation or within
five business days following the determination not to defend, whichever is earlier.
(b) The written statement of declination shall set forth with particularity all
legal and factual grounds for the declination, identify any conflicts of interest that
preclude representation, and certify that the determination was made in good faith
and in accordance with applicable law.
(2) File a copy of the written statement of declination simultaneously with
the legislative auditor and the governor.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1019 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 371
D.(1)(a) Right to alternative representation; rate parity. Upon receipt of a
written statement of declination pursuant to Subsection C of this Section, the affected
elected official or, in the case of a legislative act, the legislature acting through its
presiding officers, may retain private legal counsel of choice to provide
representation in the matter for which the attorney general has declined.
(b) The state is responsible for the cost of such alternative representation,
subject to the rate limitations established in Subsection E of this Section.
(2) The elected official or legislature shall provide written notice to the
commissioner of administration identifying the retained counsel and the matter for
which representation is sought, and the written notice shall serve as authorization for
payment from the state treasury.
(3) The obligation of the state to fund alternative representation shall
commence immediately upon receipt of the declination notice and shall continue
through final resolution of the matter, including any appeals.
E. Rate parity for alternative representation. The hourly rates, flat fees,
contingency arrangements, and other compensation structures applicable to
alternative private counsel retained pursuant to Subsection D of this Section shall be
governed as follows:
(1) The rate of compensation for alternative counsel shall not exceed the
highest rates approved by the attorney general in any contract for outside legal
services entered into by the office of the attorney general for substantially similar
legal work during the immediately preceding twenty-four-month period.
(2) The office of the attorney general shall maintain and publish, on its
official public website and update no less frequently than quarterly, a schedule of all
approved rates for outside legal services categorized by practice area, litigation
complexity, and type of proceeding. This schedule shall serve as the reference rate
schedule for purposes of this Section.
(3) If no comparable rate exists in the attorney general's approved contracts,
the parties shall negotiate a rate consistent with the prevailing market rate for legal
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1019 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 371
services of similar complexity in the relevant jurisdiction, subject to approval by the
commissioner of administration.
(4) Travel expenses, filing fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable
litigation costs incurred by alternative counsel shall be reimbursed at actual cost,
consistent with the state's general travel and expense reimbursement policies.
F. No waiver of rights. The exercise of the right to alternative representation
pursuant to this Section does not constitute a waiver of any privilege, immunity, or
defense otherwise available to the elected official or to the state in connection with
the underlying matter.
G. Coordination of defense. If the attorney general has accepted
representation of some, but not all, parties or matters in a proceeding, the attorney
general and any alternative counsel retained pursuant to this Section shall cooperate
in good faith to coordinate the defense, share relevant work product, and avoid
duplicative effort to the extent permitted by applicable rules of professional conduct
and the interests of their respective clients.
H. Legislative intervention. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit
the right of the legislature, acting through its presiding officers or by legislative
resolution, to intervene as a party in any proceeding challenging the constitutionality
or validity of a legislative act, regardless of whether the attorney general has
accepted or declined the defense.
I. Judicial review. Any elected official aggrieved by the declination of the
attorney general of representation, or the legislature aggrieved by the declination of
the attorney general to defend a legislative act, may seek judicial review of such
declination in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court. The court shall conduct a de
novo review by summary proceeding and may order the attorney general to provide
representation upon a finding that the declination was arbitrary, capricious, or
contrary to the provisions of this Part.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act apply to all pending and future legal
proceedings in which an elected official's request for representation or a challenge to a
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1019 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 371
legislative act is before the office of the attorney general on or after the effective date of this
Act.
Section 3. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, the
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications which can be given effect without
the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.